Illinois, session 104th, HB1880.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Phosphorus Credit Trading Program Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7    (1) Wastewater agencies in Illinois have made substantial 8investments to reduce the discharge of phosphorus into waters 9of the State.10    (2) Those efforts have allowed phosphorus reductions that 11are ahead of schedule and in excess of those that are required 12by permit.13    (3) Wastewater agencies should be allowed to trade with 14one another the credits generated through these phosphorus 15reductions. 16    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act: 17    "Agency" means the Environmental Protection Agency.18    "Board" means the Pollution Control Board.19    "Committee" means the Phosphorus Credit Trading Committee 20created under this Act.21    "Director" means the Director of the Environmental 22Protection Agency.  HB1880- 2 -LRB104 03049 BDA 13067 b1    "Phosphorus" means a nonmetallic element of the nitrogen 2family with atomic number 15.3    "State" means the State of Illinois.4    "Wastewater agencies" means municipal wastewater agencies 5and units of local government formed under the Sanitary 6District Act of 1907, North Shore Water Reclamation District 7Act, Sanitary District Act of 1917, Metropolitan Water 8Reclamation District Act, Sanitary District Act of 1936, 9Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 1974, and Eastern Will 10Sanitary District Act. 11    Section 15. Phosphorus Credit Trading Committee. 12    (a) The Phosphorus Credit Trading Committee is created 13within the Agency for the purpose of:14        (1) developing a framework for the trading of 15    phosphorus reduction credits generated through phosphorus 16    reductions in excess of those required by permit;17        (2) limiting the trading of phosphorus reduction 18    credits to trading among wastewater agencies; and19        (3) making recommendations to the Agency regarding the 20    framework it develops.21    (b) Upon completion of the framework described in 22subsection (a), the Phosphorus Credit Trading Committee shall 23submit a report containing the framework and its 24recommendations to the Governor, the Environmental Protection 25Agency, and the General Assembly.   HB1880- 3 -LRB104 03049 BDA 13067 b1    Section 20. Committee membership. The Committee shall be 2composed of the following members:3        (1) the Governor or his or her designee, who shall 4    serve as chairperson;5        (2) the Director or his or her designee;6        (3) one member appointed by the President of the 7    Senate;8        (4) one member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 9    Senate;10        (5) one member appointed by the Speaker of the House 11    of Representatives;12        (6) one member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 13    House of Representatives; and14        (7) the following members appointed by the Director:15            (A) 2 members who are representatives of a 16        wastewater agency with a service population of 25,000 17        or less;18            (B) 2 members who are representatives of a 19        wastewater agency with a service population of more 20        than 25,000 but less than or equal to 125,000;21            (C) 2 members who are representatives of a 22        wastewater agency with a service population of more 23        than 125,000; and24            (D) 2 members who are representatives of a 25        statewide organization representing wastewater   HB1880- 4 -LRB104 03049 BDA 13067 b1        agencies.2    Appointments to the Committee shall be made within 30 days 3after the effective date of this Act. The Committee shall meet 4at the call of the chairperson. Committee members shall serve 5without compensation. If a vacancy occurs in the Committee 6membership, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as 7the original appointment for the remainder of the Committee. 8    Section 25. Committee technical assistance. The Prairie 9Research Institute's Illinois Sustainable Technology Center 10shall provide technical assistance to the Committee. 11    Section 30. Rules to establish a phosphorus credit trading 12program. 13    (a) After consulting with the Committee, the Agency shall, 14within one year after its receipt of the Committee's report, 15propose rules to establish a program to facilitate phosphorus 16reduction credit trading among wastewater agencies. Within one 17year after receipt of the Agency's proposal, the Board shall 18adopt rules establishing a program to facilitate phosphorus 19reduction credit trading among wastewater agencies.20    (b) The rules adopted under this Section shall: 21        (1) reduce, in as cost-effective manner as possible, 22    the discharge of phosphorus into waters of the State;23        (2) establish a program for the trading of phosphorus 24    reduction credits generated through phosphorus reductions   HB1880- 5 -LRB104 03049 BDA 13067 b1    in excess of those required by permit; and2        (3) limit participation in the program to wastewater 3    agencies. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.